Alaska statutes. Title 8. Business and Professions.
Article 1. Board of Veterinary Examiners.

Administrative Code. —

For board of veterinary examiners, see 12 AAC 68.

Sec. 08.98.010.
Creation and membership of the board.

There is created the Board of Veterinary Examiners composed of five members appointed by the governor and approved by the legislature.
Four members shall be licensed veterinarians who have been in active practice in the state for at least five years preceding appointment and one shall be a public member. A person may not serve on the board who is, or was during the two years immediately preceding appointment, a member of a faculty, board of trustees, or advisory board of a veterinary school.

History.

(§ 1 ch 91 SLA 1963; am § 1 ch 94 SLA 1966; am § 2 ch 130 SLA 1980)

Sec. 08.98.020.
Term of office. [Repealed, § 49 ch 94 SLA 1987. For current law, see AS 08.01.035.]

Sec. 08.98.025.
Removal of board members. [Repealed, § 49 ch 94 SLA 1987. For current law, see AS 08.01.020.]

Sec. 08.98.030.
Executive secretary of board. [Repealed, § 16 ch 130 SLA 1980.]

Sec. 08.98.040.
Board meetings.

The board shall hold at least three meetings each year.
The board may hold special meetings at the call of the chairman or of a majority of the members.
A majority of board members constitutes a quorum and a majority vote of those present is the decision of the board.

History.

(§ 1 ch 91 SLA 1963; am § 5 ch 130 SLA 1980; am § 12 ch 59 SLA 1982)

Sec. 08.98.050.
Powers and duties of the board.

The board shall

establish examination requirements for eligible applicants for licensure to practice veterinary medicine;

examine, or cause to be examined, eligible applicants for licensure or registration;

approve the issuance of licenses and student permits to qualified applicants;

establish standards for the practice of veterinary medicine by regulation;

conduct disciplinary proceedings in accordance with this chapter;

adopt regulations requiring proof of continued competency before a license is renewed;

as requested by the department, monitor the standards and availability of veterinary services provided in the state and report its findings to the department;

collect, or cause to be collected, data concerning the practice of veterinary technology by veterinary technicians in the state and submit the data to the department for maintenance;

establish, by regulation, educational and training requirements for

the issuance of student permits; and

the delegation of duties by veterinarians licensed under this chapter to veterinary technicians;

require that a licensee who has a federal Drug Enforcement Administration registration number register with the controlled substance prescription database under AS

17.30.200(n)

;

identify resources and develop educational materials to assist licensees to identify an animal owner who may be at risk for abusing or misusing an opioid.

The board may

establish examination and registration requirements for veterinary technicians;

adopt regulations or do any act necessary to carry out its duties under this chapter.

History.

(§ 1 ch 91 SLA 1963; am § 2 ch 94 SLA 1966; am § 1 ch 54 SLA 1967; am § 6 ch 130 SLA 1980; am § 1 ch 57 SLA 1981; am § 19 ch 6 SLA 1998; am § 1 ch 108 SLA 2008; am § 31 ch 2 SSSLA 2017)

Revisor’s notes. —

Former paragraphs (a)(8)-(10) were renumbered as (a)(7)-(9), respectively, in 1998 to reflect the 1998 repeal of former paragraph (a)(7).

Administrative Code. —

For veterinary licensing and examination, see 12 AAC 68, art. 1.

For standards of practice, see 12 AAC 68, art. 2.

For continuing competency, see 12 AAC 68, art. 3.

For veterinary technicians, see 12 AAC 68, art. 4.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2017 amendment, effective July 26, 2017, in (a), added (10) and (11) and made a related change.

Legislative history reports. —

For governor's transmittal letter for
ch. 2, SSSLA 2017 (HB 159), which added paragraphs (a)(10) and (11) to this section, see 2017 House Journal 408 — 410.

Sec. 08.98.060.
Board regulations. [Repealed, § 16 ch 130 SLA 1980. For current law, see AS 08.98.050.]

Sec. 08.98.070.
Duties of the department.

The department shall furnish the board with administrative services, including renting space for holding examinations, printing and mailing licenses and student permits, sending notices, before December 1 of each year, that licenses must be renewed, collecting fees and issuing receipts, keeping a current register of licensees, employing secretarial assistants, replying to routine requests for information, printing forms and informational bulletins, typing all matter to be reproduced, maintaining records and completed examinations, and keeping records of receipts and disbursements.

History.

(§ 1 ch 91 SLA 1963; am § 3 ch 94 SLA 1966; am § 2 ch 108 SLA 2008)

Sec. 08.98.080.
Department regulations.

The department shall adopt procedural regulations necessary to carry out the duties imposed on it by AS

08.98.070

.

History.

(§ 1 ch 91 SLA 1963))

Administrative Code. —

For veterinary licensing and examination, see 12 AAC 68, art. 1.

For continuing competency, see 12 AAC 68, art. 3.

For veterinary technicians, see 12 AAC 68, art. 4.

Sec. 08.98.090.
Applicability of the Administrative Procedure Act.

AS 44.62 (Administrative Procedure Act) applies to regulations and proceedings under this chapter.

History.

(§ 1 ch 91 SLA 1963)

Sec. 08.98.100.
Compensation.

Members of the board are entitled to per diem allowances and transportation expenses allowed by law and paid members of other state examining boards.

History.

(§ 1 ch 91 SLA 1963)

Cross references. —

For per diem and travel expenses, see AS

39.20.180

.